Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2714
Designated scrapie epidemiologist, defined.

Designated scrapie epidemiologist means a state or federal veterinarian designated by the state, in conjunction with APHIS, to make decisions about the use and interpretation of diagnostic tests and field investigation data and the management of scrapie-affected flocks.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 14.